Utah statutes.
17-43-204.   Fees for substance abuse services -- Responsibility for cost of service if rendered by authority to nonresident -- Authority may receive funds from other sources.

(1)  Each local substance abuse authority shall charge a fee for substance abuse services, except that substance abuse services may not be refused to any person because of inability to pay.

(2)  If a local substance abuse authority, through its designated provider, provides a service described in Subsection 17-43-201(4) to a person who resides within the jurisdiction of another local substance abuse authority, the local substance abuse authority in whose jurisdiction the person resides is responsible for the cost of that service if its designated provider has authorized the provision of that service.

(3)  A local substance abuse authority and entities that contract with a local substance abuse authority to provide substance abuse services may receive funds made available by federal, state, or local health, substance abuse, mental health, education, welfare, or other agencies, in accordance with the provisions of this part and Title 62A, Chapter 15, Substance Abuse and Mental Health Act.

